Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.160.030

Authorized inquiries.

(1) After an applicant has otherwise been determined to be qualified for admission, an institution of higher education may, but is not required to, inquire into or obtain information about an applicant's criminal history for the purpose of:

(a) Accepting or denying an applicant for admission to the institution of higher education or restricting access to campus residency; or

(b) Offering supportive counseling or services to help rehabilitate and educate the student on barriers a criminal record may present.

(2) After inquiring into or obtaining information under this section, an institution of higher education may not automatically or unreasonably deny an applicant's admission or restrict access to campus residency based on that applicant's criminal history.

[ 2018 c 83 s 3.]